Florida, session 2026, HB1181.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (b) through (h) of subsection (1) of
section 1003.26, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
paragraphs (c) through (i), respectively, paragraph (a) of
subsection (2) is amended, and a new paragraph (b) is added to
subsection (1) of that section, to read:
1003.26 Enforcement of school attendance.—The Legislature
finds that poor academic performance is associated with
nonattendance and that school districts must take an active role
in promoting and enforcing attendance as a means of improving
student performance. It is the policy of the state that each
district school superintendent be responsible for enforcing
school attendance of all students subject to the compulsory
school age in the school district and supporting enforcement of
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1181 2026
school attendance by local law enforcement agencies. The
responsibility includes recommending policies and procedures to
the district school board that require public schools to respond
in a timely manner to every unexcused absence, and every absence
for which the reason is unknown, of students enrolled in the
schools. District school board policies shall require the parent
of a student to justify each absence of the student, and that
justification will be evaluated based on adopted district school
board policies that define excused and unexcused absences. The
policies must provide that public schools track excused and
unexcused absences and contact the home in the case of an
unexcused absence from school, or an absence from school for
which the reason is unknown, to prevent the development of
patterns of nonattendance. The Legislature finds that early
intervention in school attendance is the most effective way of
producing good attendance habits that will lead to improved
student learning and achievement. Each public school is required
to implement the following steps to promote and enforce regular
school attendance:
(1) CONTACT, REFER, AND ENFORCE.—
(b) To support the timely communication and intervention
for students with absences, each district school board shall
implement a mandatory electronic alert system within its data
management system or educational platform to notify school
administrators, the child study team, and a student's parent
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1181 2026
when a student reaches the school district's truancy threshold
for absences.
(2) GIVE WRITTEN NOTICE.—
(a) Under the direction of the district school
superintendent, a designated school representative must provide
written notice in person or by return-receipt mail to the
parent, requiring the child's enrollment or attendance within 3
days after the date of notice, when no valid reason is found for
a student's nonenrollment in school if the child is under
compulsory education requirements, and is not exempt. If the
child is not enrolled or in attendance in school within 3 days
after the notice being provided, the designated school
representative must report the case to the district school
superintendent, who must refer the case to the child study team
in paragraph (1)(c) (1)(b) at the school the student would be
assigned according to district school board attendance area
policies. In addition, the designated school representative may
refer the case to the Department of Juvenile Justice's
authorized agent for families in need of services. The child
study team must diligently facilitate intervention services and
report the case back to the district school superintendent
within 15 days after referral of the case if reasonable efforts
to resolve the nonenrollment behavior have been made and the
child is still not attending school. If the parent refuses to
cooperate or enroll the child in school within 15 days after
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1181 2026
referral of the case to the child study team, the district
school superintendent must make a report to law enforcement and
refer the case to the Office of the State Attorney to bring
criminal prosecution against the parent.
Section 2. Subsection (1) of section 984.151, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
984.151 Early truancy intervention; truancy petition;
judgment.—
(1) If the school determines that a student subject to
compulsory school attendance has had at least five unexcused
absences, or absences for which the reasons are unknown, within
a calendar month or 10 unexcused absences, or absences for which
the reasons are unknown, within a 90-calendar-day period
pursuant to s. 1003.26(1)(c) s. 1003.26(1)(b), or has had more
than 15 unexcused absences in a 90-calendar-day period, the
superintendent of schools or his or her designee may file a
truancy petition seeking early truancy intervention.
Section 3. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1003.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1003.02 District school board operation and control of
public K-12 education within the school district.—As provided in
part II of chapter 1001, district school boards are
constitutionally and statutorily charged with the operation and
control of public K-12 education within their school districts.
100 The district school boards must establish, organize, and operate
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1181 2026
101 their public K-12 schools and educational programs, employees,
102 and facilities. Their responsibilities include staff
103 development, public K-12 school student education including
104 education for exceptional students and students in juvenile
105 justice programs, special programs, adult education programs,
106 and career education programs. Additionally, district school
107 boards must:
108 (1) Provide for the proper accounting for all students of
109 school age, for the attendance and control of students at
110 school, and for proper attention to health, safety, and other
111 matters relating to the welfare of students in the following
112 areas:
113 (b) Enforcement of attendance laws.—Provide for the
114 enforcement of all laws and rules relating to the attendance of
115 students at school. District school boards are authorized to
116 establish policies that allow accumulated unexcused tardies,
117 regardless of when they occur during the school day, and early
118 departures from school to be recorded as unexcused absences.
119 District school boards are also authorized to establish policies
120 that require referral to a school's child study team for
121 students who have fewer absences than the number required by s.
122 1003.26(1)(c) s. 1003.26(1)(b).
123 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1181-00